Nebraska, session 109, LB71.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB71 LB71
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 43-536, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-536 In determining the rate of reimbursement for child care, the
Department of Health and Human Services shall assess the market rates and
costs for provision of services of the child care providers in the state,
utilizing an approved methodology in accordance with 45 C.F.R. 98.45, as
such section existed on January 1, 2024. The department shall adjust the
reimbursement rate for child care every odd-numbered year at a rate not
less than the seventy-fifth percentile of the current market rate, except
that (1) nationally accredited child care providers may be reimbursed at
higher rates and (2) an applicable child care or early childhood
education program, as defined in section 71-1954, that is participating
in the quality rating and improvement system and has received a rating of
step two three or higher under the Step Up to Quality Child Care Act may
be reimbursed at higher rates based upon the program's quality scale
rating under the quality rating and improvement system.
Sec. 2. Section 68-1206, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
68-1206 (1) The Department of Health and Human Services shall
administer the program of social services in this state. The department
may contract with other social agencies for the purchase of social
services at rates not to exceed those prevailing in the state or the cost
at which the department could provide those services. The statutory
maximum payments for the separate program of aid to dependent children
shall apply only to public assistance grants and shall not apply to
payments for social services.
(2)(a) As part of the provision of social services authorized by
section 68-1202, the department shall participate in the federal child
care assistance program under 42 U.S.C. 9857 et seq., as such sections
existed on January 1, 2023, and provide child care assistance to families
with incomes up to (i) one hundred eighty-five percent of the federal
-2-

LB71 LB71
2025 2025
poverty level prior to October 1, 2026, or (ii) one hundred thirty
percent of the federal poverty level on and after October 1, 2026.
(b)(i) As part of the provision of social services authorized by
this section and section 68-1202, the department shall participate in the
federal Child Care Subsidy program. A child care provider seeking to
participate in the federal Child Care Subsidy program shall comply with
the criminal history record information check requirements of the Child
Care Licensing Act. In determining ongoing eligibility for this program,
ten percent of a household's gross earned income shall be disregarded
after twelve continuous months on the program and at each subsequent
redetermination. In determining ongoing eligibility, if a family's income
exceeds one hundred eighty-five percent of the federal poverty level
prior to October 1, 2026, or one hundred thirty percent of the federal
poverty level on and after October 1, 2026, the family shall receive
transitional child care assistance through the remainder of the family's
eligibility period or until the family's income exceeds eighty-five
percent of the state median income for a family of the same size as
reported by the United States Bureau of the Census, whichever occurs
first. When the family's eligibility period ends, the family shall
continue to be eligible for transitional child care assistance if the
family's income is below two hundred percent of the federal poverty level
prior to October 1, 2026, or one hundred eighty-five percent of the
federal poverty level on and after October 1, 2026. The family shall
receive transitional child care assistance through the remainder of the
transitional eligibility period or until the family's income exceeds
eighty-five percent of the state median income for a family of the same
size as reported by the United States Bureau of the Census, whichever
occurs first. The amount of such child care assistance shall be based on
a cost-shared plan between the recipient family and the state and shall
be based on a sliding-scale methodology. A recipient family may be
required to contribute a percentage of such family's gross income for
-3-

LB71 LB71
2025 2025
child care that is no more than the cost-sharing rates in the
transitional child care assistance program as of January 1, 2015, for
those no longer eligible for cash assistance as provided in section
68-1724.
(ii) A licensed child care program that employs a member of an
eligible household shall make reasonable accommodations so that the
eligible applicant or adult household member is not a primary caregiver
to such applicant's or adult household member's child. If reasonable
accommodation cannot be made, the department shall allow the applicant or
adult household member to receive child care assistance for the
applicant's or adult household member's child including when the
applicant or adult household member is the primary caregiver for such
child.
(iii) A licensed child care provider eligible for the child care
subsidy may enroll the household member's child in a child care program
other than the household member's child care program to receive child
care assistance.
(iv) Subdivisions (2)(b)(ii) and (2)(b)(iii) of this section shall
become operative on July 1, 2025. The department shall promulgate rules
and regulations consistent with these subdivisions.
(c) For the period beginning July 1, 2021, through September 30,
2026, funds provided to the State of Nebraska pursuant to the Child Care
and Development Block Grant Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. 9857 et seq., as such
act and sections existed on January 1, 2023, shall be used to pay the
costs to the state resulting from the income eligibility changes made in
subdivisions (2)(a) and (b) of this section by Laws 2021, LB485. If the
available amount of such funds is insufficient to pay such costs, then
funds provided to the state for the Temporary Assistance for Needy
Families program established in 42 U.S.C. 601 et seq. may also be used.
No General Funds shall be used to pay the costs to the state, other than
administration costs, resulting from the income eligibility changes made
-4-

LB71 LB71
2025 2025
in subdivisions (2)(a) and (b) of this section by Laws 2021, LB485, for
the period beginning July 1, 2021, through September 30, 2026.
(d) The Department of Health and Human Services shall collaborate
with a private nonprofit organization with expertise in early childhood
care and education for an independent evaluation of the income
eligibility changes made in subdivisions (2)(a) and (b) of this section
by Laws 2021, LB485, if private funding is made available for such
purpose. The evaluation shall be completed by July 1, 2024, and shall be
submitted electronically to the department and to the Health and Human
Services Committee of the Legislature.
(3) In determining the rate or rates to be paid by the department
for child care as defined in section 43-2605, the department shall adopt
a fixed-rate schedule for the state or a fixed-rate schedule for an area
of the state applicable to each child care program category of provider
as defined in section 71-1910 which may claim reimbursement for services
provided by the federal Child Care Subsidy program, except that the
department shall not pay a rate higher than that charged by an individual
provider to that provider's private clients. The schedule may provide
separate rates for care for infants, for children with special needs,
including disabilities or technological dependence, or for other
individual categories of children. The schedule may also provide tiered
rates based upon a quality scale rating of step two three or higher under
the Step Up to Quality Child Care Act. The schedule shall be effective on
October 1 of every year and shall be revised annually by the department.
Sec. 3. Section 71-1961, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-1961 Quality rating and improvement system incentives and support
under the Step Up to Quality Child Care Act shall include, but not be
limited to:
(1) Tiered child care subsidy reimbursements as provided in section
68-1206 based upon quality scale ratings of step two three or higher that
-5-

LB71 LB71
2025 2025
reflect the cost of higher quality programs and promote affordability of
high-quality child care and early childhood education programs for all
families;
(2) Incentive bonuses given to providers of child care and early
childhood education programs upon completion of specific requirements of
step two ratings or higher to improve quality based upon the quality
rating criteria established pursuant to sections 71-1956 and 71-1958;
(3) Professional development, training, and scholarships developed
in collaboration with community-based organizations, postsecondary
education representatives, and other stakeholders;
(4) Support that expands family engagement in and understanding of
high-quality early childhood education in ways that are inclusive and
respectful of diversity of families and children with special needs; and
(5) Other incentives as necessary to carry out the Step Up to
Quality Child Care Act.
Sec. 4. Original section 71-1961, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and sections 43-536 and 68-1206, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-6-